Washington statutes.
RCW 17.26.006

Findings—Purpose.

This state is facing an environmental disaster that will affect other states as well as other nations. The legislature finds that six years is sufficient time for state agencies to debate solutions to the spartina and purple loosestrife problems that are occurring in state waters. One of the purposes of chapter 255, Laws of 1995 is to focus agency action on control and future eradication of spartina and purple loosestrife. It is the mandate of the legislature that one state agency, the department of agriculture, be responsible for a unified effort to eliminate spartina and control purple loosestrife, with the advice of the state noxious weed control board, and that state agency shall be directly accountable to the legislature on the progress of the spartina eradication and purple loosestrife control program.

[ 1995 c 255 s 2.]